Washington statutes.
RCW 39.36.900

Validation—1969 c 142.

All bonds heretofore issued, or heretofore voted and which may have been or may hereafter be issued, by any taxing district pursuant to any of the foregoing sections as amended or for any of the purposes authorized by any of said sections are hereby validated.

[ 1969 c 142 s 6.]